Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2449.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS; STUDENT PROGRAMS AND SERVICES.new text end new text begin $30,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $30,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota to improve and expand programs and services that increase student success by meeting basic needs such as food and housing; increasing access to mental health services; creating active, in-person learning environments; and expanding career preparation and placement. new text end